Maryland, session 2025, SB0589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 10. OPIOID RESTITUTION SETTLEMENT FUNDING INTERACTIVE
DASHBOARD.
7.5–1001.
(A) THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN AN
INTERACTIVE DASHBOARD ON OPIOID RESTITUTION FUND SPENDING FOR THE
PURPOSE OF SHARING PRESCRIPTION OPIOID–RELATED SETTLEMENT
INFORMATION WITH THE PUBLIC.
(B) THE DASHBOARD DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE, DISAGGREGATED BY STATE, COUNTY, AND
MUNICIPALITY:
– 1 –

Ch. 691 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) PAYMENT SCHEDULE INFORMATION ON ESTIMATED PAYMENTS
TO THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY FROM OPIOID SETTLEMENTS;
(2) PAST SPENDING OF SETTLEMENT FUNDS;
(3) SPENDING PLANS AND PRIORITIES; AND
(4) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF ANY INITIATIVE FUNDED WITH
SETTLEMENT FUNDS, INCLUDING PERFORMANCE MEASURES IF APPLICABLE.
(C) THE IF THERE IS A STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL WEBSITE THAT
PROVIDES ACCESS TO ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ON THE USE OF OPIOID–RELATED
SETTLEMENT FUNDS BY THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY, THE DASHBOARD
SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON PUBLIC HEARINGS CONDUCTED IN THE STATE,
COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY REGARDING THE USE OF SETTLEMENT FUNDS FROM THE
OPIOID RESTITUTION FUND A LINK TO THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL
WEBSITE.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY THAT:
(I) COMPLIES WITH REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED IN AN OPIOID–RELATED SETTLEMENT; AND
(II) SHARES THE DATA IN THE REPORTS REQUIRED UNDER AN
OPIOID–RELATED SETTLEMENT WITH THE APPROPRIATE STATE ENTITY.
(2) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY RECEIVING SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SHALL PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT THE NECESSARY FINANCIAL INFORMATION
RELATED TO SETTLEMENT FUNDING TO INCLUDE AS INFORMATION ON THE
DASHBOARD.
(2) (3) INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
TERMS OF ANY OPIOID–RELATED SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT.
(3) (4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UPLOAD OPIOID–RELATED
SETTLEMENT INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT BY A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF AN OPIOID–RELATED
SETTLEMENT.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 691
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN ONLINE PORTAL WITH
INSTRUCTIONS FOR A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY TO REPORT OR UPLOAD REQUIRED
INFORMATION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR USE IN THE DASHBOARD.
(E) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE DASHBOARD SHALL USE EXISTING
PLATFORMS THAT PROVIDE DATA ON OPIOID USE AND OVERDOSES IN THE STATE.
(F) THE DASHBOARD SHALL BE DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED USING
FUNDS FROM THE OPIOID RESTITUTION FUND AS APPROPRIATED THROUGH THE
STATE BUDGET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –